Washington statutes.
RCW 26.12.270

Address confidentiality program.

The court shall act in accordance with the requirements of the address confidentiality program pursuant to chapter 40.24 RCW in the course of all proceedings under this title. A court order for information protected by the address confidentiality program may only be issued upon completing the requirements of RCW 40.24.075.

[ 2012 c 223 s 8.]